California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) The land including any accretion thereto has been occupied openly and notoriously by persons claiming title thereto or their predecessors. Land shall be deemed occupied for the purpose of this section when protected by a substantial enclosure; or when usually cultivated; or when improvements have been constructed thereon by the persons claiming such title or their predecessors, including, in the case of improvements located waterward of the landward toe of a levee, that land surrounding such improvements as is incidental to the usual and reasonable use of the improvements.

(b) Taxes (state, county or municipal) have been levied and assessed during such period on such land including any accretion thereto and such persons or their predecessors have paid all such taxes during such period. The requirements of this subparagraph shall be deemed to have been met during any period when the owner or claimant to such land was exempt from ad valorem taxation.

(c) The persons claiming title or their predecessors have based their claim upon a deed or map, or both, describing or depicting the land including any accretion thereto, which deed or map has been recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the land is situated.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as vesting in an adjacent or contiguous landowner title to any lands which have been artificially filled by the landowner or his predecessors or any public agency or which have attached to his lands as a result of an avulsive change in the shoreline or as the result of an avulsive change in the course of, or an artifical rechannelization of, any river or stream, or divesting such landowner of any title which he may have to any lands which have been artificially dredged by the landowner or his predecessors or any public agency or which have detached from his land as a result of an avulsive change in the shoreline or as the result of an avulsive change in the course of, or an artifical rechannelization of, any river or stream.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1447.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Development of State Lands [6370. - 6378.]

6370.

The commission, acting in concert with the Resources Agency and the Office of Planning and Research, and in cooperation with other appropriate state, federal, and local agencies, shall inventory unconveyed state school and tide and submerged lands and identify such lands which possess significant environmental values, including scenic, historic, natural, or aesthetic values of statewide interest. The commission, upon identification of such lands, shall adopt regulations necessary to assure permanent protection to these lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 688.)
-------------------------------------------

6370.1.

The Office of Planning and Research shall, for purposes of Section 6370, define “significant environmental values”, which definition shall include, but not be limited to, the criteria developed pursuant to Section 65041 of the Government Code. Such definition shall be submitted to the commission for its approval and adoption at a public hearing. The commission shall submit the adopted definition, including reasons in support of the adopted definition, to the Legislature no later than January 15, 1974.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 688.)
-------------------------------------------

6370.2.

The commission shall submit a final report to the Legislature by January 15, 1975, which identifies those lands determined by the commission to possess significant environmental values and sets forth the applicable criteria upon which such determinations were made, including the findings and regulations adopted pursuant to Section 6370. The report shall further contain recommended additional actions necessary to assure permanent protection of such lands. In its investigation, the commission shall consider the California Protected Waterways Plan required pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 1278 of the Statutes of 1968, and any and all other reports and plans relating to the protection of scenic, historic, natural, or aesthetic values.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 688.)
-------------------------------------------

6371.

Until submission of the report required in Section 6370.2 the State Lands Commission shall not sell any of the lands under its jurisdiction unless it has made a finding at a public meeting that such sale is necessary for the health, welfare or safety of the people of the state or a finding that such land would not meet the intent of environmentally significant lands indicated in Section 6370; provided, however, that this section and Sections 6372, 6373, 6374, and 6375 shall not be applicable to settlements of title and boundary problems by the commission and exchanges in connection therewith. The commission shall not lease any of the lands under its jurisdiction unless it shall have complied with the environmental impact report requirements of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) and rules and regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 21082.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 688.)
-------------------------------------------

6373.

At least 10 days before the commission authorizes a conveyance of state lands to a private party or other governmental agency, the commission shall notify, by letter, the chair of the relevant policy committees of the Legislature and each Member of the Legislature in whose district any part of the state lands is located of the proposed conveyance and make the information regarding the proposed conveyance publicly available on the commission’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 715, Sec. 4.   (AB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6376.

It is the intent of the Legislature that any inventory prepared pursuant to this chapter shall be solely for informational purposes and not to establish rights of ownership. Any boundaries mapped or described by the commission in any such inventory shall not be binding upon any upland owner or other party affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1555.)
-------------------------------------------

6377.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to tidelands transferred pursuant to Chapter 1333 of the Statutes of 1968, to tidelands and submerged lands heretofore granted to the City of Long Beach or to oil revenues and dry gas revenues whose disposition is governed by Chapter 138 of the Statutes of 1964, First Extraordinary Session, or to any sovereign or other state lands transferred to the City of Oakland in trust by the state for port purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1555.)
-------------------------------------------

6378.

The commission shall determine the ownership of all salmon and steelhead spawning areas as designated by Section 1505 of the Fish and Game Code. All areas found to be state property shall be permanently protected by the state, and no sale, lease or disposal of material shall be made as to such areas, except that rights-of-way and easements may be granted to, and leases entered into with, public utilities for the installation, operation, and maintenance of public utility facilities unless the Director of Fish and Game shall determine that such facilities would prove deleterious to fishlife.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1405.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Reservation of Minerals [6401. - 6407.]

6401.

(a) All oil, gas, oil shale, coal, phosphate, sodium, gold, silver, and all other mineral deposits in public lands belonging to the state, or which may become the property of the state, are reserved to the state. Such deposits are reserved from sale except upon a rental and royalty basis and except as otherwise provided by law. A purchaser of any public lands belonging to the state, or which may become property of the state, shall acquire no right, title, or interest in or to such deposits. The right of such purchaser shall be subject to the reservation of all oil, gas, oil shale, coal, phosphate, sodium, gold, silver, and all other mineral deposits, and to the conditions and limitations prescribed by law providing for the state and persons authorized by it to prospect for, mine, and remove such deposits, and to occupy and use so much of the surface of the land as may be required for all purposes reasonably extending to the mining and removal of such deposits therefrom; provided, that when any person, authorized by the state to prospect for said reserved deposits to the extent provided for in this division, enters upon such land, such person so entering shall be liable to and shall compensate such purchaser of land for all damage and injury to the permanent improvements and the crops on such lands by reason of such prospecting; provided, further, that persons who have acquired the right to mine and remove such deposits may reenter, occupy and use so much of the surface of the land as may be required for all purposes reasonably extending to the mining and removal of such deposits therefrom; first, upon securing the written consent or waiver of the purchaser of such public land; second, upon payment of the damages to crops or other tangible improvements to the owner thereof, where agreement may be had as to the amount thereof; or third, in lieu of either of the foregoing provisions, upon the execution of a good and sufficient bond or undertaking to the State of California for the use and benefit of the purchaser of such land, to secure the payment of such damages to the crops or tangible improvements of the purchaser of said land as may be determined and fixed in an action brought upon the bond or undertaking in a court of competent jurisdiction against the principal and sureties thereon, such bond or undertaking to be in the form and in accordance with the rules and regulations prescribed by the commission; and provided, further, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to any compromise agreement entered into under this division, nor to any exchange of real property where the state receives the mineral rights in the parcel or parcels being acquired by the state.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), upon a finding by the commission that there are no known deposits of commercially valuable minerals in and above a plane located 500 feet below the surface of any lands sold or exchanged or to be sold or exchanged by the state to another, including land sold pursuant to Section 6404, and wherein any or all of the mineral deposits have been or are required by law to be reserved to the state, the commission may by quitclaim, patent, agreement, or other appropriate instrument, modify the accompanying rights of the state to the use of the surface of such lands, including any right to enter such lands to a depth of 500 feet below the surface of such lands, as will permit the orderly use and developmenmt of all such sold or exchanged lands. Any such finding by the commission and any such modification of accompanying rights of the state as provided in this subdivision shall be conclusive in favor of any purchaser or encumbrancer of such sold or exchanged lands acting in good faith and for value. Any modification authorized by this subdivision which affects school land Sections 16 and 36 granted to the state by and upon the terms and conditions set forth in Section 870 of Title 43 of the United States Code, shall not be made in a manner inconsistent with the terms and conditions set forth in such federal law so long as such terms and conditions are effective. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to authorize the relinquishment of any mineral rights in such lands owned or reserved to the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1014.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 6401, the commission may sell to a surface property owner, for not less than fair market value, the state’s reserved mineral interest in a parcel of land comprised of 466.66 acres, described in Section 36, T 3 S, R 14 E, SBB&M, consisting of lots 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 8, 9, 10, and 11, N 1/2 of NW 1/4, and W 1/2 of NE 1/4, located in Riverside County, upon those terms and conditions, and subject to any reservations and exceptions as the commission determines are in the best interests of the state. Proceeds from the sale shall be deposited in accordance with the requirements of Section 6217.7.

(b) For purposes of this section “surface property owner” means a person who is the owner of a parcel of real property, but who does not have the right to prospect for, mine, or remove mineral deposits from that property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 701, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6402.

All applications to purchase state public lands and all sales pursuant thereto shall be subject to and contain a reservation to the State of all oil, gas, oil shale, coal, phosphate, sodium, gold, silver, and all other mineral deposits in all lands so acquired, and shall also contain a reservation to the State, and persons authorized by it, of the right to prospect for, mine, and remove such deposits and to occupy and use so much of the surface as may be required therefor, and all certificates of purchase and patents issued therefor shall contain such reservations.

Whenever authorized by law to make grants of land to the United States of America, or to an officer, department, or agency thereof, either in exchange for other lands or otherwise, the commission may make such grants with or without the reservation of deposits of oil and gas and other minerals required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 227.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.

This chapter shall not be construed as applicable to the sale or exchange by the state of the following lands:

(a) Lands acquired by the state on sale thereof for delinquent taxes, other than lands the deed for which is required to be filed with the Department of Finance or the commission.

(b) Lands acquired by the state by foreclosure of any lien for taxes due the state, or for penalties or interest thereon, or by execution of any judgment for money due the state, or lands which are seized by the state and sold pursuant to Section 7891 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) Lands acquired by the state under the provisions of the Streets and Highways Code and sold or exchanged pursuant to the provisions of Section 104.5 thereof.

(d) Lands which have escheated to the state or which have been distributed to the state by court decree in estates of deceased persons.

(e) Lands which have escheated to the state under the provisions of Proposition 1 of the General Election of 1920, page 1 xxxiii, as amended.

(f) Land acquired by the state for public use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 56.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.

Any state agency that sells any of the lands listed in Section 6403, other than tax-deeded lands, may, with the approval of the commission, dispose of oil and gas, other gases, including, but not limited to, nonhydrocarbon and geothermal gases, oil shale, coal, phosphate, alumina, silica, fossils of all geological ages, sodium, gold, silver, or other mineral deposits, metals and their compounds, alkali, alkali earth, sand, clay, gravel, salts and mineral waters, uranium, trona, and geothermal resources, together with the right to prospect for, mine and remove such deposits or resources, and to occupy and use so much of the surface of the land as may be necessary therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------

6405.

The commission shall have the sole responsibility for and jurisdiction over the administration, management and disposal of all mineral reservations heretofore and hereafter made under the provisions of Section 6404, and is hereby authorized to rent or lease all or part of the property represented by such mineral reservations in the manner and under the conditions now or hereafter prescribed by law with respect to the rent or lease of school lands belonging to the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1212.)
-------------------------------------------

6406.

The commission is hereby authorized to sell, exchange, rent, lease, or otherwise manage the property represented by all mineral reservations to the State made prior to the effective date of Section 6403 of this code, as added by Chapter 227 of the Statutes of 1947, with respect to any lands of the classes specifically exempt from this chapter under the provisions of that section, other than lands acquired by the State under the provisions of the Streets and Highways Code, in such manner and upon such conditions as commissions may determine; provided, that any proceeds from the rent, lease, or other management of mineral reservations to the State made in connection with property which has been distributed or escheated to the State in connection with unclaimed estates of deceased persons shall be disposed of as provided by law with respect to other property in unclaimed estates of deceased persons. The commission shall furnish the Controller the name of the estate in connection with any money collected by the commission and transmitted by it to the State Treasury in connection with mineral reservations relating to unclaimed estates of deceased persons. The commission, through its executive officer, shall have the power to sign, on behalf of the State and the commission, all deeds, leases, agreements or other documents required in connection with the exercise by the commission of the powers vested in it by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1212.)
-------------------------------------------

6407.

This section is enacted for the purpose of declaring the scope and extent of the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities and jurisdiction of the commission and the legislative intent with respect to reservation of mineral deposits reserved to the state pursuant to Section 6401; but nothing herein shall be construed as limiting any power, duty, purpose, responsibility, or jurisdiction heretofore, or by this code, vested in or conferred upon the commission.

Mineral deposits reserved to the state shall include all mineral deposits in lands belonging to, or which may become, the property of the state, including but not limited to, oil and gas, other gases including, but not limited to, nonhydrocarbon and geothermal gases, oil shale, coal, phosphate, alumina, silica, fossils of all geological ages, sodium, gold, silver, metals and their compounds, alkali, alkali earth, sand, clay, gravel, salts and mineral waters, uranium, trona, and geothermal resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 316.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Exchange of Certain Lands With the Federal Government [6441. - 6445.]

6441.

Public lands of the State, situated within the exterior boundaries of a National forest, which in the judgment of the commission are more valuable for timber than for any other purpose, may be exchanged for timber lands of the United States of equal value, in one or more compact tracts, situated in the State. The commission shall select the lands to be so exchanged and arrange with the proper officials of the United States for their exchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6442.

Public lands of the State, situated within the exterior boundaries of a National park, which in the judgment of the commission are more valuable for timber or recreational uses than for any other purpose may be exchanged for timber lands or other public lands of the United States of equal value, in one or more compact tracts, situated in the State. The commission shall select the lands to be so exchanged and arrange with the proper officials of the United States for their exchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 548.)
-------------------------------------------

6443.

The commission may cooperate with the Secretary of the Interior, may select the lands of this State to be exchanged with the United States under Section 8 of an act of Congress entitled “An act to stop injury to the public grazing lands by preventing overgrazing and soil deterioration, to provide for their orderly use, improvement and development, to stabilize the livestock industry dependent upon the public range, and for other purposes,” approved June 28, 1934, and may arrange with the proper officials of the United States for such exchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 980.)
-------------------------------------------

6444.

Whenever in the judgment of the commission it is to the advantage of the State to exchange any of its public lands, as provided in Sections 6441, 6442 and 6443, the commission shall so certify to the Governor, who shall thereupon execute, on behalf of the State, any instruments of conveyance necessary to effect the exchange.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6443 by Stats. 1943, Ch. 980.)
-------------------------------------------

6445.

No lands shall be accepted in exchange under this article without the approval of the commission. All lands so acquired shall be subject to the laws governing State lands of the class from which the exchange was made.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6444 by Stats. 1943, Ch. 980.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Quiet Title Actions [6461. - 6465.]

6461.

Any person or persons claiming any interest in or to real property which is alleged to be claimed by the State of California to be situated in the former bed of a navigable river or stream in this State, may bring suit against the State of California, in accordance with law in any court of competent jurisdiction of the State, to quiet title to such property and may prosecute the action to final judgment. If the judgment be given against the State in such suit, no costs shall be recovered against the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

6462.

Service of summons in a suit shall be upon the chair of the State Lands Commission and the Attorney General and it shall be the duty of the Attorney General to represent the state in the suit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 213, Sec. 12.   (AB 2768)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6463.

Any person or persons claiming title under a patent of tideland, issued by the State of California, may bring suit against the State, or against the State with others, in accordance with law in any court of competent jurisdiction of the State, to quiet title or otherwise determine the validity of such patent or establish boundaries of the land granted thereby or both, and may prosecute the action to final judgment. Service of summons on the State in any such suit shall be made in the manner provided in Section 6462 of this code. If judgment is given against the State in any such action or proceeding, no costs shall be recovered from the State thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

6464.

Any person or persons claiming title to land adjoining tide or submerged land, herein called “adjoining land,” under a patent issued by the United States of America or the State of California, may bring suit against the State, or against the State with others, in accordance with law in any court of competent jurisdiction of the State, to fix and determine the boundary between said adjoining land and the tide or submerged land which it adjoins, and may prosecute the action to final judgment. Service of summons on the State in any such suit shall be made in the manner as provided in Section 6462 of this code. If judgment is given against the State in any such action or proceeding, no costs shall be recovered from the State thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 813.)
-------------------------------------------

6465.

The complaint in any action pursuant to this chapter shall, on request, contain a plat of the property to which the action relates which shows the location of the property in relation to a monument in a survey of record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. State Teachers’ Retirement Lands Act [6475. - 6477.]

6475.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “State Teachers’ Retirement Lands Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1213, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6477.

(a) The commission shall report quarterly to the Teachers’ Retirement Board and annually to the Legislature and the Governor on all of the following:

(1) The management of school and lieu lands.

(2) Waivers, suspensions, reductions, alterations, or amendments made by the commission pursuant to Section 6916, together with the reasons therefor.

(3) Acquisitions made pursuant to Section 8705, including a summary of
 downpayments and any other transaction costs.

(b) The commission shall file a report with the Legislature annually on all waivers, suspensions, reductions, alterations, or amendments made by the commission pursuant to this section, together with the reasons therefor.

(c) The reports required pursuant to this section shall be prepared in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 715, Sec. 5.   (AB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. LEASING OF PUBLIC LANDS [6501. - 7100.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Leasing Law [6501. - 6509.]

6501.

As used in this chapter, “lease” includes a permit, easement, or license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1241.)
-------------------------------------------

6501.1.

Lands owned by the state and which are under the jurisdiction of the commission may be leased for such purpose or purposes as the commission deems advisable, including, but not limited to, grazing leases and leases for commercial, industrial, and recreational purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

6501.2.

The commission shall prepare forms of leases for use under this chapter for such purposes as the commission deems advisable, including grazing leases and leases for commercial, industrial, and recreational purposes. Each form of lease shall contain such terms and conditions as the commission deems to be for the best interests of the state.

The commission shall also prepare forms of applications for each type of lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

6501.3.

Any interests in lands, or lands in fee simple, acquired by the commission or by any department, board, or other commission, of the State by purchase, donation, lease, condemnation, or otherwise, may, with the approval of the Department of Finance, be made available to any lessee of the State by the commission or the department, board, or other commission of the State, for the purposes contained in this chapter and upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by the state agency acquiring the land. This section does not, however, authorize the commission or any department, board, or other commission of the State to make any interests in lands, or lands in fee simple acquired by the State for beach or park purposes available to any lessee of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2124.)
-------------------------------------------

6502.

Any person, firm, or corporation desiring to lease any of the lands owned by the state, or in which the state may have an interest, and which are under the jurisdiction of the commission, for any purpose not prohibited or otherwise provided for by law, may make application therefor to the commission, describing the lands sought to be leased by legal subdivisions, or, if such lands are unsurveyed, by metes and bounds or by such other method as the commission may prescribe. The application shall be accompanied by a reasonable filing fee prescribed by the commission by rule or regulation, but such fee may not exceed the average of the commission’s actual costs of receiving applications and making the initial title review for leases or the permits of the class applied for.

All applications to lease lands under this chapter shall be approved or rejected by the commission within 180 days after receipt thereof or within 90 days after completion of the environmental impact report required by Section 6371, whichever shall occur later. In no event shall an application be held more than 270 days after receipt without approval or rejection by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

6503.

Upon receipt of an application to lease lands under this chapter, the commission shall appraise the lands and fix the annual rent or other consideration therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1353.)
-------------------------------------------

6503.5.

(a) Consistent with Section 6503, the commission shall charge rent for a private recreational pier constructed on state lands. Rent shall be based on local conditions and local fair annual rental values.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to either of the following:

(1) A lease in effect on
 July 1, 2011, for the term of that lease. If a lease in effect on July 1, 2011, expires or is otherwise terminated, the commission shall include fair annual rent provisions pursuant to subdivision (a) in the new lease contract.

(2) A lease for which the application and application fees were submitted to the commission prior to March 31, 2011.

(c) “Recreational pier” includes a fixed facility for the docking or mooring of boats.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 585, Sec. 3.   (SB 152)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6504.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Event” means a competition event that uses lands owned by the state that are under the jurisdiction of the commission.

(2) “Prize compensation” includes prize or purse money, other prizes, goods, or other compensation.

(b) The commission, for any event that awards prize compensation to competitors in gendered categories, shall require as a
 condition of a lease that, for any participant level that receives prize compensation, the prize compensation for each gendered category be identical at each participant level. The commission shall not approve a lease for an event that does not comply with this condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 276, Sec. 3.   (AB 467)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6505.5.

No grazing or recreational lease shall be for a period longer than 10 years except that when the recreational use is combined and is incidental to residential use on the same parcel, and the lease so recites, the lease shall not exceed 50 years. The lessee shall be notified by mail of the filing of any application to purchase the leased land or any portion thereof. The lease shall terminate as to the whole or the portion of the lands described therein on the date the sale of the whole or of such portion of the leased land is approved by the commission. The lessee shall be notified by registered mail of the termination of the lease as to the whole or portion sold. As to the portion of leased lands not sold, it shall be the option of the lessee to terminate the lease, or to cause the lease to be amended for the unexpired term, at the same annual rental per acre, without the payment of any additional fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1818.)
-------------------------------------------

6506.

Possession under any lease authorized by this chapter shall not be held to be adverse to that of any person who becomes an actual settler upon any portion of land described in such lease with intent to purchase it in the manner provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 887.)
-------------------------------------------

6507.

Any error in the description of any lease may, with the consent of the holder thereof, be corrected or any description amended by the commission when in its judgment it is to the best interests of the state so to do.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1353.)
-------------------------------------------

6508.

Any lease for sixteenth and thirty-sixth sections or any portion thereof which are now or may hereafter be included within the exterior boundaries of a national reservation or of a reserve, or within the exterior boundaries of lands withdrawn from public entry, shall terminate whenever the State designates the lands as bases for indemnity selections as provided by law. The lessee shall be notified by the commission by registered mail whenever the State so designates the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 887.)
-------------------------------------------

6509.

If a lease is terminated by reason of the sale of the land, or by the designation of land as a base for indemnity selections, the lessee shall surrender the lease to the commission and receive in exchange therefor from the commission a certificate showing the proportionate amount of the annual payment to be refunded to the lessee, for the tract of land that has been disposed of by the State. If the lease has been amended because of the sale of a portion of the lands described therein, the commission shall, at the option of the lessee, credit the lessee with the amount of the prepaid rental applicable to rental due for the remaining term of the lease or issue a certificate to the lessee showing the proportionate amount of the rental to be refunded to the lessee. The State Controller, upon the surrender to him of the certificate, shall issue to the lessee a warrant for the amount payable out of the State School Fund or, if the rentals received under the lease were deposited in the General Fund, then the warrant shall be payable out of any appropriation available for such purpose, and the State Treasurer shall pay the same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Development and Improvement of Granted Tide and Submerged Lands [6701. - 6707.]

6701.

Subject to the provisions of Section 6702, no amendment, modification, or revocation, in whole or in part, of any grant of tide or submerged lands heretofore made or that may be hereafter made by the Legislature shall impair or affect the rights or obligations of third parties, including lessees, lenders for value, holders of contracts conferring the right to the use and occupation of, or the right to conduct operations upon or within such lands, arising from leases, contracts, or other instruments lawfully entered into prior to the effective date of such amendment, modification, or revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

6702.

(a) The provisions of Section 6701 shall not apply to any of the following unless the provisions of subdivision (b) are first complied with:

(1) Any lease, contract, or other instrument entered into on or after the effective date of this chapter.

(2) Any lease, contract, or other instrument entered into before the effective date of this chapter if (i) such lease, contract, or other instrument affects lands which have been filled in between January 1, 1970, and the date of any such amendment, modification, or revocation by the
 Legislature, or (ii) there have not been erected, prior to January 1, 1970, any artificial structures on any of the lands affected thereby pursuant to any exercise of rights expressly or impliedly conferred by any such lease, contract, or other instrument and under the terms of such lease, contract, or other instrument the total capital expenditures reasonably anticipated on such lands are ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or greater.

(3) Any amendment, modification, or alteration made on or after January 1, 1970, to any lease, contract, or other instrument entered into before the effective date of this chapter if such amendment, modification, or alteration either extends the term of such lease, contract, or other instrument for more than six months or authorizes the erection of improvements not previously authorized thereby upon lands unoccupied by permanent structures as of January 1, 1970. For purposes of this chapter, “lease, contract, or
 other instrument” includes any amendment, modification, or alteration described by this paragraph.

(b) The provisions of Section 6701 shall be applicable to any lease, contract, or other instrument described in subdivision (a) which is submitted to the State Lands Commission and as to which the commission makes all the following determinations:

(1) That such lease, contract, or other instrument is in accordance with the terms of the grant or grants under which title to the tide or submerged lands in question is held.

(2) That the proceeds of such lease, contract, or other instrument shall be deposited in an appropriate fund expendable only for statewide purposes authorized by a legislative grant.

(3) That such lease, contract, or other instrument is in
 the best interests of the state.

(c) The provisions of Section 6701 shall apply to any lease, contract, or other instrument entered into before the effective date of this chapter if such lease, contract, or other instrument is not one described by subdivision (a), without requiring that it be submitted to the State Lands Commission.

(d) For purposes of this section, lands shall be deemed to have been “filled in” if such lands were permanently or periodically covered by tidal waters on or after January 1, 1970, and thereafter are either raised to a level above mean lower low water by the deposition of earth or other materials thereon or have permanent artificial structures erected thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

6703.

Whenever a lease, contract, or other instrument is submitted to the State Lands Commission pursuant to Section 6702, the costs of any study or investigation, including a reasonable reimbursement for employees’ time, incurred by the State Lands Division in processing and investigating such submittal shall be borne by the legislative grantee or the person or entity making such submittal, as may be agreed upon between the commission and such grantee or other person or entity making such submittal, in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

6704.

Failure of the State Lands Commission to issue to the legislative grantee a written report making, or declining to make with reasons for so declining, the determinations set forth in Section 6702 within 90 days of receipt from the legislative grantee of all material required by the rules and regulations of the commission to be submitted pursuant to Section 6702, or within any other period of time mutually agreed upon by the commission and the legislative grantee, shall be the equivalent of an affirmative finding with respect to each of such determinations required by Section 6702 and the provisions of Section 6701 shall become applicable to the lease, contract, or other
 instrument in question.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1451.)
-------------------------------------------

6705.
